Utah statutes.
7-7-41.   Additional powers of associations belonging to federal home loan
bank system.
(1)  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any association
organized under the laws of this state that is a member of the federal home
loan bank system and whose accounts are insured by the federal government or
an instrumentality of the federal government shall have, in addition to all
rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and immunities expressly granted under
this title, all additional rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and
immunities possessed, as of May 1, 1989, by federal associations the home
offices of which are located in this state.
(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
commissioner may make reasonable rules authorizing an association to exercise
any of the powers or enjoy any privileges, benefits, or immunities conferred
at the time of the adoption of the rules upon federal associations, the home
offices of which are located in this state, or may modify or reduce reserve or
other requirements of an association insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation or successor federal deposit insurance agency, if the commissioner
finds that the rule:
(a)  serves the convenience and advantage of depositors and borrowers; and
(b)  maintains the fairness of competition and parity between state chartered
associations and federally chartered associations.
(3)  It is the intent and desire of the Legislature, in allowing the
acquisition of additional rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and immunities
by the associations of this state, to avoid competitive inequalities between
federal associations and associations organized under the laws of this state.
This section shall be broadly construed in order to give effect to this
intent.
